Utah statutes.
53B-17-601.   Utah Museum of Natural History -- Traveling exhibits and
Outreach Programs.
(1)  There is established at the University of Utah the Utah Museum of Natural
History, where tangible objects reflecting the past, present, and continuing
development of our natural history may be collected and displayed for
educational and cultural purposes.
(2) (a)  The museum shall make available to people throughout the state,
through traveling exhibits and outreach programs, archeological and
paleontological objects retrieved from the state of Utah.
(b)  The museum shall provide professional expertise and assistance in the
proper care of the archeological and paleontological collections from state
lands as they are housed throughout the state.
(3)  The museum shall submit an annual request to the Legislature to fund the
ongoing costs of the programs authorized under Subsection (2) as part of its
base budget.
